Hawaii, session 2025, SB1212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the real estate commission is responsible for, among other things, overseeing condominium projects, condominium associations, managing agents, and condominium hotel operators.  The real estate commission is also responsible for administering the condominium education trust fund for educational purposes, including education and research in the field of condominium management.  Presently, there are approximately 1,668 condominium association registrations and twenty-nine condominium hotel operator registrations in the State.  The legislature also finds that more than half of all condominium buildings in the State were built before 1980, with a significant number of them requiring replacements, upgrades, and retrofits to comply with building codes and maintain insurability.  Because these projects are costly and complicated, condominium associations have deferred necessary maintenance and structural repairs over the past several years and are becoming less insurable. The legislature believes that, by adding experts in high rise building design and maintenance to the real estate commission, such as licensed engineers and architects, the real estate commission may be better able to address the issues that condominiums are facing with respect to deferred maintenance, structural repairs, and insurability. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to ensure that the real estate commission is better able to address the current issues among condominium properties in the State by: (1)  Increasing the membership size of the real estate commission from nine members to eleven members; and (2)  Requiring at least two members of the real estate commission to be licensed professional engineers or architects. SECTION 2.  Section 467-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§467-3 Commission, appointments, qualifications, tenure.  There shall be appointed a commission to be known as the real estate commission, to consist of [nine] eleven members, at least four of whom shall be licensed real estate brokers who have been engaged in business as licensed real estate brokers or salespersons for three years immediately preceding their appointments[, each of whom].  At least two members shall be licensed professional engineers or architects who have been engaged in business as licensed professional engineers or architects in the State for three years immediately preceding their appointments.  All members shall be a citizen of the United States and shall have resided in the State for at least three years preceding appointment, and one of whom shall be designated by the appointing power as chairperson. Four members shall be residents of the city and county of Honolulu, one shall be a resident of the county of Hawaii, one shall be a resident of the county of Maui, and one shall be a resident of the county of Kauai and two members shall be public members. Appointments shall be made for a term of four years, commencing from the date of expiration of the last preceding term and shall be made to expire on June 30.  Appointments shall be made so that at least one appointment shall be required each year. Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.